Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1753.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6911. Transportation network service offenses. (a) Match verification.--An individual who is a transportation network company driver and fails to use match verification as required under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2605(d) (relating to t ransportation network company drivers) is guilty of a summary offense.(b) False representation for inducement to enter.--An individual who falsely represents that the individual is a transportation network company driver for the purpose of 12345678910111213141516171819 inducing another individual to enter a vehicle shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree.(c) False representation for inducement resulting in bodily harm.--An individual who falsely represents that the individual is a transportation network company driver for the purpose of inducing an individual to enter a vehicle, resulting in bodily injury to the other individual, is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "t ransportation network company driver" shall have the same meaning given to it in 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).Section 2. Section 2601 of Title 66 is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 2601. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Match verification." A process by which a transportation network company uses a personal identification number, device proximity or other system to confirm that an intended transportation network company passenger is entering a vehicle operated by the intended transportation network company driver.Section 3. Section 2605 of Title 66 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2605. Transportation network company drivers.* * *(d) Match verification required.--A transportation network company driver shall use match verification for any prearranged 20250HB1753PN2160 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ride requested by an individual through the transportation network company's digital network.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1753PN2160 - 3 - 123